Massachusetts, session 194th, H643.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16C of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 7 and 8, the words “, subject to
appropriation;"
of 1